Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.98.020

Title, chapter, section headings not part of law.

Title headings, chapter headings, and section or subsection headings, as used in this title do not constitute any part of the law.

[ 1955 c 33 s 30.98.020. Formerly RCW 30.98.020.]